North Carolina statutes. Chapter 86A. Barbers.
§ 86A-24.
Apprenticeship.

Before being issued an apprentice license, an applicant must pass an examination conducted by the Board to determine his competence, including his knowledge of barbering, sanitary rules and regulations, and knowledge of diseases of the face, skin and scalp.

An apprentice license expires on May 31 of each year. Every holder of an apprentice license shall annually renew the apprentice license by the expiration date and pay the required renewal fee. An apprentice license issued under this Chapter is automatically suspended by operation of law after failure to renew the apprentice license by the expiration date. An apprentice whose apprentice license has expired may have the certificate restored immediately upon paying all lapsed renewal fees and the required late fee. The certificate of registration of an apprentice is valid only so long as the apprentice works under the supervision of a registered barber. The registered barber shall remain present on the premises of the barbershop at all times while the apprentice is working. No apprentice shall operate a barbershop.

On completion of at least one year’s apprenticeship, evidenced by affidavit of the supervising registered licensed barber or barbers, and upon meeting the other requirements of

G.S. 86A-3

, the apprentice shall be issued a license as a registered barber, pursuant to

G.S. 86A-10

. No registered apprentice may practice for a period exceeding three years without retaking and passing the required examination to receive a certificate as a registered apprentice.

History.

1929, c. 119, ss. 4, 5; 1941, c. 375, s. 3; 1975, c. 68, ss. 1, 2; 1979, c. 695, s. 1; 1981, c. 457, s. 14; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 605, s. 13; 2004-146, s. 8.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-146, s. 8, effective July 29, 2004, inserted the sixth sentence in subsection (b).

§ 86A-25.
Fees collectible by Board.

The State Board of Barber Examiners shall charge fees not to exceed the following:

Certificate of registration or renewal as a barber $ 50.00 Certificate of registration or renewal as an apprentice barber 50.00 Barbershop permit or renewal 50.00 Examination to become a registered barber 85.00 Examination to become a registered apprentice barber 85.00 Late fee for restoration of an expired barber certificate within first year after expiration 35.00 Late fee for restoration of an expired barber certificate after first year after expiration but within five years after expiration 70.00 Late fee for restoration of an expired apprentice certificate within first year after expiration 35.00 Late fee for restoration of an expired apprentice certificate after first year after expiration but within three years of first issuance of the certificate 45.00 Late fee for restoration of an expired barbershop certificate 45.00 Examination to become a barber school instructor 165.00 Student permit 25.00 Issuance of any duplicate copy of a license, certificate, or permit 10.00 Barber school permit or renewal 130.00 Late fee for restoration of an expired barber school certificate 85.00 Barber school instructor certificate or renewal 85.00 Late fee for restoration of an expired barber school instructor certificate within first year after expiration 45.00 Late fee for restoration of an expired barber school instructor certificate after first year after expiration but within three years after expiration 85.00 Inspection of newly established barbershop 120.00 Inspection of newly established barber school 220.00 Issuance of a registered barber or apprentice certificate by certification 120.00 Barbers 70 years and older certificate or renewal No charge Reasonable charges for certified copies of public documents Reasonable charges for duplication services and material.

Click to view

History.

1929, c. 119, s. 14; 1937, c. 138, s. 4; 1945, c. 830, ss. 4, 8; 1951, c. 821, s. 1; 1957, c. 813, s. 3; 1961, c. 577, s. 5; 1965, c. 513; 1971, c. 826, ss. 1, 2; 1973, c. 1331, s. 3; c. 1398; 1979, c. 695, s. 1; 1981, c. 753; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1029, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 605, s. 14; 2004-146, s. 11.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-146, s. 11, effective July 29, 2004, increased the fees, and added the last two lines.

§ 86A-26.
Barbering among members of same family.

This Chapter shall not prohibit a member of a family from practicing barbering on a member of his or her family. For purposes of this section, “a member of his or her family” means a spouse, brother, sister, parent, grandparent, child, grandchild, mother-in-law, father-in-law, daughter-in-law, son-in-law, stepparent, or stepchild.

History.

1941, c. 375, s. 12; 1979, c. 695, s. 1; 2004-146, s. 9.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-146, s. 9, effective July 29, 2004, added the second sentence.

§ 86A-27.
Civil penalties; disciplinary costs.

Authority to Assess Civil Penalties. — The Board may assess a civil penalty not in excess of five hundred dollars ($500.00) per offense for the violation of any section of this Chapter or the violation of any rules adopted by the Board. The clear proceeds of any civil penalty assessed under this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

Consideration Factors. — Before imposing and assessing a civil penalty, the Board shall consider the following factors:

The nature, gravity, and persistence of the particular violation.

The appropriateness of the imposition of a civil penalty when considered alone or in combination with other punishment.

Whether the violation was willful and malicious.

Any other factors that would tend to mitigate or aggravate the violations found to exist.

Schedule of Civil Penalties. — The Board shall establish a schedule of civil penalties for violations of this Chapter and rules adopted by the Board.

Costs. — The Board may in a disciplinary proceeding charge costs, including reasonable attorneys’ fees, to the licensee against whom the proceedings were brought.

History.

2004-146, s. 10.